incubator/apertium-asm/apertium-asm.asm.dix
      <e><p><l>গ'ইছিল</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ইছিল</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>গ'ইছিল</l><r>জা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pastperf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>াব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>িব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>াব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ব</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="হয়_vbser">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  

<!--Added May 3rd 2014 -->
 <pardef n="নৈতিক_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="মুখ_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>টো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>েৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>খিনি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>খন</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


 <pardef n="যুক্তি_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>টো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>য়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাকক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটাক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>বোৰক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাকত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটাত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="অভিযান_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	 <e><p><l>টো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লৈ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  	<e><p><l>বোৰৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাকৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>বোৰলৈ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="পদ্ধতি_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ে</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e><p><l>খিনি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
     
      <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>বোৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাকক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটাক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>য়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
     <e><p><l>কেইটাই</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>ৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>টো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটাৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e><p><l>বিলাকে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>    
   <e><p><l>বোৰক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বোৰত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাকত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটাত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="পূর্ণতা_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>লৈ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>য়ে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

 <pardef n="সঙ্গীত_n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>টো</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>েৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>বিলাক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>কেইটা</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="সৰিয়হ_n">
            <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

       <e><p><l>বোৰ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ৰ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ৰে</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ত</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>খিনি</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
           <e><p><l>খিনিক</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



 

    <e lm="লাগে"><i>লাগে</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="লাগে"><i>লাগে</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হয়"><i>হয়</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হ'ল"><i>হ'ল</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হ'ব"><i>হ'ব</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হৈ গ'ল"><i>হৈ<b/>গ'ল</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হৈ যাব"><i>হৈ<b/>যাব</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হৈছিল"><i>হৈছিল</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="হ'ম"><i>হ'ম</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাল পাওঁ"><i>ভাল<b/>পাওঁ</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="নকৰিবি"><i>নকৰিবি</i><par n="হয়_vbser"/></e>
     <e lm="পাউৰুটী"><i>পাউৰুটী</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
  	<e lm="খাপ"><i>খাপ</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	  <e lm="পছন্দ"><i>পছন্দ</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	  <e lm="কোম্পানি"><i>কোম্পানি</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	 <e lm="অৰিহণা"><i>অৰিহণা</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
  	<e lm="বিপদ"><i>বিপদ</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="সমস্যা"><i>সমস্যা</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
  	<e lm="হাতি"><i>হাতি</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
        <e lm="বিশ্বাস"><i>বিশ্বাস</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
 	 <e lm="ফোঁৱাৰা"><i>ফোঁৱাৰা</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	  <e lm="দেখন"><i>দেখন</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	  <e lm="হেলিকপ্টাৰ"><i>হেলিকপ্টাৰ</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
 	 <e lm="অসুস্থতা"><i>অসুস্থতা</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="বস্তু"><i>বস্তু</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="নেতৃত্ব"><i>নেতৃত্ব</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
<e lm="পূর্ণতা"><i>পূর্ণতা</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
<e lm="অভিযান"><i>অভিযান</i><par n="অভিযান_n"/></e>
<e lm="পৰিহাস"><i>পৰিহাস</i><par n="অভিযান_n"/></e>
<e lm="নৈতিক"><i>নৈতিক</i><par n="নৈতিক_n"/></e>
<e lm="সঙ্গীত"><i>সঙ্গীত</i><par n="সঙ্গীত_n"/></e>
<e lm="সৰিয়হ"><i>সৰিয়হ</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
<e lm="ৰহস্য"><i>ৰহস্য</i><par n="মুখ_n"/></e>
<e lm="নাম"><i>নাম</i><par n="মুখ_n"/></e>
<e lm="তেল"><i>তেল</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
<e lm="ছবি"><i>ছবি</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="সম্ভাৱনা"><i>সম্ভাৱনা</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="পুৰস্কাৰ"><i>পুৰস্কাৰ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="সংখ্যা"><i>সংখ্যা</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="প্রতিবাদ"><i>প্রতিবাদ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="চতুৰ্থাংশ"><i>চতুৰ্থাংশ</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
<e lm="হাৰ"><i>হাৰ</i><par n="মুখ_n"/></e>
<e lm="প্রতিবেদন"><i>প্রতিবেদন</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="বিশ্রাম"><i>বিশ্রাম</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="টকা"><i>টকা</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="বাসস্থান"><i>বাসস্থান</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="সমাজ"><i>সমাজ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="দাগ"><i>দাগ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="শক্তি"><i>শক্তি</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="ঘাম"><i>ঘাম</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
<e lm="লক্ষণ"><i>লক্ষণ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="চাহ"><i>চাহ</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
<e lm="আলসুৱা"><i>আলসুৱা</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
<e lm="গাজনি"><i>গাজনি</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="অশান্তি"><i>অশান্তি</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="পানী"><i>পানী</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
<e lm="অস্ত্র"><i>অস্ত্র</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
<e lm="আত্মজীৱনী"><i>আত্মজীৱনী</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="বিজাণু"><i>বিজাণু</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="হল"><i>হল</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="জৰিমানা"><i>জৰিমানা</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="চাদৰ"><i>চাদৰ</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="বোলছবি"><i>বোলছবি</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="সংসাৰ"><i>সংসাৰ</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="টেলিফোন"><i>টেলিফোন</i><par n="যুক্তি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="বতৰ"><i>বতৰ</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="কেলচিয়াম"><i>কেলচিয়াম</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="স্মাতক"><i>স্মাতক</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="জনস্বাস্থ্য"><i>জনস্বাস্থ্য</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="সন্তান"><i>সন্তান</i><par n="সঙ্গীত_n"/></e>
	<e lm="বতাহ"><i>বতাহ</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
	<e lm="দূৰত্ব"><i>দূৰত্ব</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="শীর্ষ"><i>শীর্ষ</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="চেলচিয়াচ"><i>চেলচিয়াচ</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="নিয়ৰ"><i>নিয়ৰ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="হকি"><i>হকি</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
	<e lm="শুনানি"><i>শুনানি</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="ৰাগবি"><i>ৰাগবি</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="সোপর্দ"><i>সোপর্দ</i><par n="পূর্ণতা_n"/></e>
	<e lm="ডিজেল"><i>ডিজেল</i><par n="সৰিয়হ_n"/></e>
	<e lm="ডাকঘৰ"><i>ডাকঘৰ</i><par n="পদ্ধতি_n"/></e>
